Hawaii statutes.
[§346-392] Definitions. As used in
this part, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

"Case plan" means a plan developed by
the department, in consultation with the young adult, as developmentally
appropriate, containing a written description of the programs and services that
will help the young adult transition from foster care to independent living.

"Court" means one of the family
courts established pursuant to chapter 571.

"Department" means the department of
human services and its authorized representatives.

"Foster custody" means the legal
status created when the department places a child outside of the family home
with the agreement of the legal custodian or pursuant to court order as set
forth in chapter 587A.

"Party" means the department or the
young adult who is subject to a proceeding brought under this part and may
include any other person whose participation the court finds is in the best
interest of the young adult.

"Permanent custody" means the legal
status created by order of the court after the termination of parental rights
as set forth in chapter 587A.

"Young adult" means a person who has
attained the age of eighteen or older, but is less than twenty-one years of
age. [L 2013, c 252, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next